Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 2. Homestead Exemptions

Law reviews:

For article, “Homestead Marshalling”, see 14

C

olo. Law. 1612 (1985).

38-41-201.
Homestead exemption - definitions.

Every homestead in the state of Colorado shall be exempt from execution and attachment arising from any debt, contract, or civil obligation not exceeding in actual cash value in excess of any liens or encumbrances on the homesteaded property in existence at the time of any levy of execution thereon:

The sum of seventy-five thousand dollars if the homestead is occupied as a home by an owner thereof or an owner’s family; or

The sum of one hundred five thousand dollars if the homestead is occupied as a home by an elderly or disabled owner, an elderly or disabled spouse of an owner, or an elderly or disabled dependent of an owner.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Disabled owner”, “disabled spouse”, or “disabled dependent” means an owner, spouse, or dependent who has a physical or mental impairment that is disabling and that, because of other factors such as age, training, experience, or social setting, substantially precludes the owner, spouse, or dependent from engaging in a useful occupation, as a homemaker, a wage earner, or a self-employed person in any employment that exists in the community and for which he or she has competence.

“Elderly owner”, “elderly spouse”, or “elderly dependent” means an owner, spouse, or dependent who is sixty years of age or older.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 385, § 57.

G.L.

§ 1343.

G.S.

§ 1631.

R.S. 08:

§ 2950.

C.L.

§ 5924.

CSA:

C. 93, § 23.

L. 51:

P. 522, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 77-3-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 77-3-1.

L. 73:

P. 916, § 2.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1444, § 1, effective July 14.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1828, § 1, effective May 21.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 384, § 6, effective May 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 717, § 3, effective May 23.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 879, § 7, effective May 14.

L. 2015:

(1) amended,(SB 15-283), ch. 301, p. 1241, § 6, effective July 1.

38-41-201.5.
Legislative declaration of homestead exemption for mobile homes.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that, as the cost of conventional housing continues to escalate, mobile homes will become an ever larger percentage of the total housing supply, particularly for the elderly and the low-to-moderate income groups; that the purchase of a mobile home is a major investment; that most mobile homes are permanently or semipermanently located; that great improvements have been made in the quality and variety of such homes; and that mobile homes are dwellings which should be accorded a status equivalent to conventional homes. The general assembly recognizes, however, that mobile homes are more readily moved than conventional homes; that they are presently bought and sold as personal property and that there are advantages to both the industry and consumers to continue this practice; and that they presently have a dual nature in the area of taxation and tax collection; therefore mobile homes should be entitled to a homestead exemption.

History.

Source:
L. 82:

Entire section added, p. 544, § 1, effective January 1, 1983.

38-41-201.6.
Mobile home, manufactured home, trailer, and trailer coach homestead exemption.

A manufactured home as defined in section 38-29-102 (6) that includes a mobile home or manufactured home as defined in section 38-12-201.5 (5), 5-1-301 (29), or 42-1-102 (106)(b), that has been purchased by an initial user or subsequent user, and for which a certificate of title or registration has been issued in accordance with section 38-29-110 or pursuant to section 38-29-108, is a homestead and is entitled to the same exemption as enumerated in section 38-41-201, except for any loans, debts, or obligations incurred prior to January 1, 1983. For purposes of this homestead exemption, the term “house” as used in section 38-41-205 is deemed to include mobile homes or manufactured homes.

A trailer as defined in section 42-1-102 (105), C.R.S., or a trailer coach as defined in section 42-1-102 (106)(a), C.R.S., that has been purchased by an initial user or subsequent user and for which a certificate of title or registration has been issued pursuant to section 42-3-103, C.R.S., is a homestead and is entitled to the same exemption as enumerated in section 38-41-201, except for any loans, debts, or obligations incurred prior to July 1, 2000. For purposes of this homestead exemption, the term “house” as used in section 38-41-205 shall be deemed to include trailers or trailer coaches.

History.

Source:
L. 82:

Entire section added, p. 544, § 1, effective January 1, 1983.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1462, § 2, effective June 15.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 707, § 14, effective April 19; entire section amended, p. 2567, § 85, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 717, § 4, effective May 23.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 1279, § 53, effective June 5.

L. 2020:

(1) amended,(HB 20-1196), ch. 195, p. 928, § 22, effective June 30.

Editor’s note:

Amendments to this section by Senate Bill 94-92 and Senate Bill 94-1 were harmonized.

38-41-202.
Homestead to be created automatically in certain cases - filing of statement required in other cases.

The homestead exemptions described in section 38-41-201 shall be deemed created and may be claimed if the occupancy requirement of section 38-41-203 and the requirement of section 38-41-205 relating to the type of property which may be homesteaded are met.

A homestead exemption granted under the provisions of this part 2 shall not be deemed created and may not be claimed if the debt, contract, or civil obligation which is the basis for the execution and attachment was entered into or incurred prior to July 1, 1975, unless the owner of the property (householder) records in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county where the property is situate an instrument in writing describing such property, setting forth the nature and source of the owner’s interest therein, and stating that the owner is homesteading such property, which instrument may be acknowledged as provided by law.

The spouse of the owner of the property may homestead the property in the manner provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) with the same effect as if the owner had done so.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (4) of this section, property homesteaded solely by operation of the automatic provisions of subsection (1) of this section may be conveyed or encumbered by the owner of the property free and clear of all homestead rights, and no signature other than that of the owner shall be required. The owner of the property shall be determined without regard to the ownership of any homestead rights.

If the owner of the property (householder) or the spouse of the owner records in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county where the property is situated an instrument in writing describing the property, setting forth the name of the owner of the property and the nature and source of the owner’s interest in the property, and stating that the owner or the owner’s spouse is homesteading the property (which instrument may be acknowledged as provided by law), then the signature of both spouses to convey or encumber the property is required.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 385, § 58.

G.L.

§ 1344.

G.S.

§ 1632.

L. 03:

P. 246, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2951.

L. 11:

P. 452, § 1.

C.L.

§ 5925.

CSA:

C. 93, § 24.

L. 53:

P. 411, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 77-3-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 77-3-2.

L. 73:

P. 1157, § 3.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1444, § 2, effective July 14.

L. 77:

(3) and (4) added, p. 1719, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 2015:

(2)(b) and (4) amended,(HB 15-1069), ch. 27, p. 67, § 1, effective August 5.

38-41-203.
Exemption only while occupied.

Said property, when so homesteaded, shall only be exempt as provided in this part 2 while occupied as a home by the owner thereof or his family.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 385, § 59.

G.L.

§ 1345.

G.S.

§ 1633.

R.S. 08:

§ 2952.

C.L.

§ 5926.

CSA:

C. 93, § 25.

L. 53:

P. 411, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 77-3-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 77-3-3.

38-41-204.
Surviving spouse and minor children entitled.

When any person dies seized of a homestead leaving a surviving spouse or minor children, such surviving spouse or minor children are entitled to the homestead exemption. In cases where there is neither surviving spouse nor minor children, the homestead shall be liable for the debts of the deceased.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 385, § 60.

G.L.

§ 1346.

G.S.

§ 1634.

R.S. 08:

§ 2953.

C.L.

§ 5927.

CSA:

C. 93, § 26.

CRS 53:

§ 77-3-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 77-3-4.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1041, § 20, effective July 1, 1995.

38-41-205.
Of what homestead may consist.

The homestead mentioned in this part 2 may consist of a house and lot or lots or of a farm consisting of any number of acres.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 386, § 61.

G.L.

§ 1347.

G.S.

§ 1635.

R.S. 08:

§ 2954.

C.L.

§ 5928.

CSA:

C. 93, § 27.

L. 53:

P. 412, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 77-3-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 77-3-5.

L. 82:

Entire section amended, p. 552, § 1, effective March 11.

38-41-206.
Levy on homestead - excess - costs.

Before any creditor of the owner of the homesteaded property may proceed against said property, such creditor shall file with the county clerk and recorder of the proper county and the sheriff or other proper officer authorized to levy on said property:

His affidavit showing:

A description of the homesteaded property and the name of the claimant of the homestead exemption;

The fair market value of said property;

That the fair market value of said property less any prior liens or encumbrances thereon exceeds the amount of the homestead exemption fixed in section 38-41-201 for which the claimant qualifies; and

That no previous execution arising out of the same judgment has been levied upon said property;

The affidavit of a professionally qualified independent appraiser showing the same information required by subparagraphs (I) to (III) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

If the amount offered at the sale of the homesteaded property does not exceed seventy percent of the fair market value shown in the affidavit of the independent appraiser filed pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section, all proceedings to sell said property shall terminate. The sheriff or the proper officer shall then file for record in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the proper county an instrument releasing all levies on said property in connection with such sale, and the person instituting the proceedings shall pay the costs of such proceedings, and the title of the owner to said property shall not be impaired or affected.

If the successful bidder at such sale is a judgment creditor, he shall be required to pay in cash to the sheriff or other proper officer making the sale an amount sufficient to pay the exemption plus the proper costs and expenses and shall not have the right to have such exempt amount applied toward the satisfaction of his judgment.

If a sale is made, the proceeds thereof shall be applied in the following order:

First, to the discharge of all prior liens and encumbrances, if any, on said property;

Second, to the homestead claimant in the amount of the homestead exemption for which he qualifies;

Third, to the sheriff or other proper officer making the sale in an amount sufficient to pay the proper costs and expenses of the sale;

Fourth, to the satisfaction of the judgment; and

Fifth, the balance, if any, to the homestead claimant.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 386, § 63.

G.L.

§ 1349.

G.S.

§ 1637.

R.S. 08:

§ 2956.

C.L.

§ 5930.

CSA:

C. 93, § 28.

L. 53:

P. 412, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 77-3-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 77-3-6.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1445, § 3, effective July 14.

L. 83:

(1)(a)(III) amended, p. 1478, § 1, effective July 1.

38-41-207.
Proceeds exempt - bona fide purchaser.

The proceeds from the exempt amount under this part 2, in the event the property is sold by the owner, or the proceeds from such sale under section 38-41-206 paid to the owner of the property or person entitled to the homestead shall be exempt from execution or attachment for a period of two years after such sale if the person entitled to such exemption keeps the exempted proceeds separate and apart from other moneys so that the same may be always identified. If the person receiving such proceeds uses said proceeds in the acquisition of other property for a home, there shall be carried over to the new property the same homestead exemption to which the owner was entitled on the property sold. Such homestead exemption shall not be valid as against one entitled to a vendor’s lien or the holder of a purchase money mortgage against said new property.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 386, § 64.

G.L.

§ 1350.

G.S.

§ 1638.

R.S. 08:

§ 2957.

C.L.

§ 5931.

CSA:

C. 93, § 29.

L. 53:

P. 413, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 77-3-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 77-3-7.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1446, § 4, effective July 14.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 879, § 8, effective May 14.

38-41-208.
Survival of exemption.

If the property qualifies as a homestead for a joint tenant who is the husband or wife of the other joint tenant or one of the other joint tenants, then, upon the death of either spouse, the homestead shall continue in effect on the interest in such property of the surviving spouse. If the property qualifies as a homestead for a joint tenant who is the parent of one or more of the other joint tenants who are minors, then, upon the death of such parent leaving no spouse surviving, the homestead shall continue in effect on the interest in such property of the surviving minor children.

If the property qualifies as a homestead for a joint tenant who is not related to any other joint tenant as husband or wife or parent and minor child, then, upon the death of such joint tenant, his homestead shall cease and terminate, and the property shall be held by the surviving tenants free of any homestead interest of such decedent, his spouse, or his minor children.

History.

Source:
L. 53:

P. 413, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 77-3-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 77-3-8.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1446, § 5, effective July 14.

38-41-209.
Insurance proceeds.

Whenever the improvements on property which has been homesteaded are insured in favor of a person entitled to the exemption and a loss is incurred entitling such person to the insurance or a part thereof, such insurance proceeds to the amount of the exemption shall be exempt in the same manner as provided for a sale of the homesteaded property.

History.

Source:
L. 53:

P. 413, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 77-3-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 77-3-9.

38-41-210.
Definitions - vendor’s rights.

The terms “owner of the property” and “householder” mean a person holding any equity under a contract of sale or other agreement whereby such person is holding possession of the property, but the rights of the vendor or seller in such contract or other agreement shall always be superior to any homestead.

History.

Source:
L. 53:

P. 413, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 77-3-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 77-3-10.

38-41-211.
Exemption in addition to allowances.

The homestead exemption granted under this part 2 shall be in addition to and not in lieu of the exempt property and family allowances to a surviving spouse and minor and dependent children of a decedent and the preferences granted to dependents of protected persons under articles 10 to 20 of title 15, C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 53:

P. 413, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 77-3-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 77-3-11.

L. 73:

P. 1648, § 10.

38-41-212.
Waiver.

Any purchase by an encumbrancer, lienholder, or any other person or any redemption by a junior lienholder pursuant to a foreclosure sale conducted by any court, sheriff, public trustee, or other public official pursuant to a mortgage, deed of trust, or other lien which contains a waiver of homestead rights in the encumbered property shall be subject to such waiver of homestead rights, and the purchaser of or person redeeming the property shall be entitled to acquire said property free of any homestead rights and without compliance with the requirements of section 38-41-206.

Any purchase by an encumbrancer, lienholder, or any other person or any redemption by a junior lienholder pursuant to a foreclosure sale conducted by any court, sheriff, public trustee, or other public official pursuant to a mortgage, deed of trust, or other lien, except a tax sale pursuant to article 11 of title 39, C.R.S., which does not contain a waiver of homestead rights in the encumbered property shall be subject to such homestead rights.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 1479, § 1, effective June 15.